netlify/functions/hello-world/verbs.dix
    <pardef n="la_lat_yak_svAxi">
        <e><par n="la_lat_yak"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lat_yak_wuxAxi">
        <e><par n="la_lat_yak"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lat_yak_ruXAxi">
        <e><par n="la_lat_yak"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lat_yak_wanAxi">
        <e><par n="la_lat_yak"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lat_yak_kryAxi">
        <e><par n="la_lat_yak"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lat_yak_curAxi">
        <e><par n="la_lat_yak"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="la_lot_yak_BvAxi">
        <e><par n="la_lot_yak"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lot_yak_axAxi">
        <e><par n="la_lot_yak"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lot_yak_juhowyAxi">
        <e><par n="la_lot_yak"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lot_yak_xivAxi">
        <e><par n="la_lot_yak"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lot_yak_svAxi">
        <e><par n="la_lot_yak"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lot_yak_wuxAxi">
        <e><par n="la_lot_yak"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lot_yak_ruXAxi">
        <e><par n="la_lot_yak"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lot_yak_wanAxi">
        <e><par n="la_lot_yak"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lot_yak_kryAxi">
        <e><par n="la_lot_yak"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lot_yak_curAxi">
        <e><par n="la_lot_yak"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="la_laf_yak_BvAxi">
        <e><par n="la_laf_yak"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_laf_yak_axAxi">
        <e><par n="la_laf_yak"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_laf_yak_juhowyAxi">
        <e><par n="la_laf_yak"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_laf_yak_xivAxi">
        <e><par n="la_laf_yak"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_laf_yak_svAxi">
        <e><par n="la_laf_yak"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_laf_yak_wuxAxi">
        <e><par n="la_laf_yak"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_laf_yak_ruXAxi">
        <e><par n="la_laf_yak"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_laf_yak_wanAxi">
        <e><par n="la_laf_yak"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_laf_yak_kryAxi">
        <e><par n="la_laf_yak"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_laf_yak_curAxi">
        <e><par n="la_laf_yak"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="la_viXilif_yak_BvAxi">
        <e><par n="la_viXilif_yak"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_viXilif_yak_axAxi">
        <e><par n="la_viXilif_yak"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_viXilif_yak_juhowyAxi">
        <e><par n="la_viXilif_yak"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_viXilif_yak_xivAxi">
        <e><par n="la_viXilif_yak"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_viXilif_yak_svAxi">
        <e><par n="la_viXilif_yak"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_viXilif_yak_wuxAxi">
        <e><par n="la_viXilif_yak"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_viXilif_yak_ruXAxi">
        <e><par n="la_viXilif_yak"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_viXilif_yak_wanAxi">
        <e><par n="la_viXilif_yak"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_viXilif_yak_kryAxi">
        <e><par n="la_viXilif_yak"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_viXilif_yak_curAxi">
        <e><par n="la_viXilif_yak"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_BvAxi_w">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_w"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_BvAxi_iw">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_iw"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_BvAxi_Iw">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_Iw"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_BvAxi_D">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_D"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_BvAxi_X">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_X"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_BvAxi_t">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_t"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_axAxi_t">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_t"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_axAxi_w">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_w"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_axAxi_iw">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_iw"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_axAxi_D">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_D"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_axAxi_X">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_X"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_juhowyAxi_t">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_t"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_juhowyAxi_w">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_w"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_juhowyAxi_iw">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_iw"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_juhowyAxi_Iw">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_Iw"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_juhowyAxi_D">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_D"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_juhowyAxi_X">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_X"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_juhowyAxi_t">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_t"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_xivAxi_w">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_w"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_xivAxi_iw">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_iw"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_xivAxi_Iw">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_Iw"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_xivAxi_D">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_D"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_xivAxi_X">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_X"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_xivAxi_t">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_t"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_svAxi_w">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_w"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_svAxi_iw">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_iw"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_svAxi_Iw">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_Iw"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_svAxi_D">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_D"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_svAxi_X">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_X"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_svAxi_t">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_t"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_wuxAxi_w">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_w"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="I1"><i>I</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lot_yak_xivAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="sq2"><i>s</i><par n="mr_q_ri"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lot_yak_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="sq2"><par n="at_a"/><i>s</i><par n="mr_q_ri"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_laf_yak_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="sq2"><i>s</i><par n="mr_q_ri"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_viXilif_yak_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="hal1"><i>hal</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_viXilif_yak_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="sWal1"><i>sWal</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lot_yak_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="sWal1"><par n="at_a"/><i>sWal</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_laf_yak_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="rux1"><par n="at_a"/><i>rux</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_laf_yak_axAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="rux1"><i>rux</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_viXilif_yak_axAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="Svas1"><i>Svas</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lot_yak_axAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="vqS1"><i>vqS</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lot_yak_xivAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="vqS1"><par n="at_a"/><i>vqS</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_laf_yak_xivAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="vqS1"><i>vqS</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_viXilif_yak_xivAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="XqR1"><i>XqR</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_svAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="XqR1"><par n="at_a"/><i>XqR</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_laf_yak_svAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="XqR1"><i>XqR</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_viXilif_yak_svAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="qX2"><i>qX</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lot_yak_svAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="luT3"><i>luT</i><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_lot_yak_wuxAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="luT3"><par n="at_a"/><i>luT</i><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_laf_yak_wuxAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="luT3"><i>luT</i><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_viXilif_yak_wuxAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="hud3"><i>hud</i><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_lat_yak_wuxAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="kqw2"><i>kqw</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lat_yak_ruXAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="kqw2"><i>kqw</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lot_yak_ruXAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="kqw2"><par n="at_a"/><i>kqw</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_laf_yak_ruXAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="kqw2"><i>kqw</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_viXilif_yak_ruXAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="van3"><i>van</i><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_lat_yak_wanAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="van3"><i>van</i><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_lot_yak_wanAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="van3"><par n="at_a"/><i>van</i><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_laf_yak_wanAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="van3"><i>van</i><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_viXilif_yak_wanAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="muR2"><i>muR</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lot_yak_kryAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="muR2"><i>muR</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_viXilif_yak_kryAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="Kac1"><i>Kac</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_kryAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="Kac1"><par n="at_a"/><i>Kac</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_laf_yak_kryAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="anc2"><i>a</i><par n="mr_n_F"/><i>c</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lot_yak_curAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="anc2"><par n="at_a_A"/><i></i><par n="mr_n_F"/><i>c</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_laf_yak_curAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="anc2"><i>a</i><par n="mr_n_F"/><i>c</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_viXilif_yak_curAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="mux2"><i>m</i><par n="mr_u_o"/><i>x</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lat_yak_curAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="i4"><par n="up_aXy"/><par n="mr_i_e"/><par n="var_4"/><par n="la_lut_krm_axAxi_w"/></e>
    <e lm="smq1"><i>sm</i><par n="mr_q_ar"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_BvAxi_w"/></e>
    <e lm="wQ1"><i>w</i><par n="mr_Q_ar"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_BvAxi_Iw"/></e>
    <e lm="cax1"><i>cax</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_BvAxi_iw"/></e>
    <e lm="guh1"><i>g</i><par n="mr_u_o"/><par n="md_h"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_BvAxi_D"/></e>
    <e lm="yaB1"><i>ya</i><par n="mr_B_b"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_BvAxi_X"/></e>
    <e lm="kqR1"><i>k</i><par n="mr_q_ar"/><i>R</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_BvAxi_t"/></e>
    <e lm="as2"><p><l>Bav</l><r>as</r></p><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lut_krm_axAxi_iw"/></e>
    <e lm="mqj2"><i>m</i><par n="mr_q_Ar"/><par n="mr_j_R"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lut_krm_axAxi_t"/></e>
